Utah statutes.
11-26-1.   Definitions -- Ceiling on local charges based on gross revenues of public service provider.

(1)  As used in this chapter:

(a)  "Local charge" means one or more of the following charges paid by a public service provider to a county or municipality:

(i)  a tax;

(ii)  a license;

(iii)  a fee;

(iv)  a license fee;

(v)  a license tax; or

(vi)  a charge similar to Subsections (1)(a)(i) through (v).

(b)  "Municipality" means:

(i)  a city; or

(ii)  a town.

(c)  "Public service provider" means a person engaged in the business of supplying taxable energy as defined in Section 10-1-303.

(2)  A county or a municipality may not impose upon, charge, or collect from a public service provider local charges:

(a)  imposed on the basis of the gross revenues of the public service provider;

(b)  derived from sales, use, or both sales and use of the service within the county or municipality; and

(c)  in a total amount that is greater than 6% of gross revenues.

(3)  The determination of gross revenues under this section may not include:

(a)  the sale of gas or electricity as special fuel for motor vehicles; or

(b)  a local charge.

(4)  This section may not be construed to:

(a)  affect or limit the power of counties or municipalities to impose sales and use taxes under:

(i)  Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act; or

(ii)  Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 3, Municipal Energy Sales and Use Tax Act; or

(b)  grant any county or municipality the power to impose a local charge not otherwise provided for by law.

(5)  This section takes precedence over any conflicting provision of law.

